Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Sec. 08.72.110.
License required.

A person may not practice, attempt to practice, or offer to practice optometry without first obtaining a license from the board.

A person not licensed as an optometrist may not fit, sell, or dispose of or take, receive, or solicit an order for fitting, sale, or disposition of spectacles, eyeglasses, or lenses for the correction or relief of an optical or visual defect of the human eye or sell spectacles, eyeglasses, or lenses from house to house, or in the streets or highways. This chapter does not apply to the sale of toy glasses, goggles consisting of plano-white or plano-colored lenses or ordinary colored glasses, or complete ready-made spectacles and eyeglasses sold only as merchandise, or the sale or repair of eyeglass frames, or repair or replacement of lenses without pretense of adapting them to the eyes.

History.

(§ 35-3-134 ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 50 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Collateral references. —

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Sec. 08.72.115.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 117 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.72.120.
Registration. [Repealed § 9 ch 50 SLA 1988.]

Sec. 08.72.125.
Licensing of branch offices. [Repealed, § 3 ch 94 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 08.72.130.
Optometry register. [Repealed, § 13 ch 37 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 08.72.140.
Qualifications for licensure.

An applicant for licensure as an optometrist

shall be a graduate of a school or college of optometry recognized by the board;

may not have committed an act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted a violation of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter at the time the act was committed;

may not have been disciplined by an optometry licensing entity in another jurisdiction and may not be the subject of a pending disciplinary proceeding conducted by an optometry licensing entity in another jurisdiction; however, the board may consider the disciplinary action and, in the board’s discretion, determine if the person is qualified for licensure;

shall have successfully completed

the written and practical portions of an examination on ocular pharmacology approved by the board that tests the licensee’s or applicant’s knowledge of the characteristics, pharmacological effects, indications, contraindications, and emergency care associated with the prescription and use of pharmaceutical agents;

a nontopical therapeutic pharmaceutical agent course of at least 23 hours approved by the board or an examination approved by the board on the treatment and management of ocular disease; and

an optometry and nontopical therapeutic pharmaceutical agent injection course of at least seven hours approved by the board or equivalent training acceptable to the board; and

shall meet other qualifications for licensure as established under this chapter and regulations adopted by the board under AS

08.72.050

; the regulations must include qualifications for licensees who hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number that address training in pain management and opioid use and addiction.

History.

(§ 35-3-141 ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 95 SLA 1966; am §§ 3 — 5 ch 76 SLA 1969; am §§ 10, 23 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 94 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 24 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 2010; am § 24 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For a provision authorizing the board to remove the restrictions or limitations that are imposed by a restricted license issued under § 8, ch. 27, SLA 2010, to an optometrist if the optometrist meets the requirements of paragraph (4) of this section, see § 8(f), ch. 27, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, in (5), added “the regulations must include qualifications for licensees who hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number that address training in pain management and opioid use and addiction.”

Sec. 08.72.150.
Application for examination and issuance of license.

An applicant shall apply for the examination by filing an application with the department together with the examination fee by the deadline established by the department in regulations. The department may require the applicant to submit a photograph of the applicant for its files; however, the photograph may not be forwarded with the application to the board for review. Upon successful completion of the examination by the applicant and payment of the license fee, the board shall issue a license to the successful applicant. The applicant may practice optometry in the state upon receipt of the license.

History.

(§ 35-3-141 ACLA 1949; am § 6 ch 76 SLA 1969; am § 5 ch 50 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For provision describing the validity of a license issued by the board under this section before June 2, 2010, see § 8(a), ch. 27, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 08.72.160.
Examination.

The examination must consist of two sections: (1) all or part of a national or international examination designated by regulation by the board; and (2) an examination approved by the board that is designed to test the applicant’s knowledge of the laws of Alaska governing the practice of optometry and the regulations adopted under those laws.

[Repealed, § 9 ch 49 SLA 1988.]

An applicant who fails the examination may retake the examination upon payment of a fee established under AS

08.01.065

.

[Repealed, § 7 ch 27 SLA 2010.]

History.

(§ 35-3-141 ACLA 1949; am § 7 ch 76 SLA 1969; am § 11 ch 75 SLA 1980; am §§ 2 — 4, 9 ch 49 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 16 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 7 ch 27 SLA 2010)

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Sec. 08.72.170.
Licensure by credentials.

The board shall issue a license by credentials to an applicant who

is a graduate of a school or college of optometry recognized by the board;

has passed a written examination approved by the board that is designed to test the applicant’s knowledge of the laws of Alaska governing the practice of optometry and the regulations adopted under those laws;

holds a current license to practice optometry in another state or territory of the United States or in a province of Canada that has licensure requirements that the board determines are equivalent to those established under this chapter;

at some time in the past, received a license to practice optometry from another state or territory of the United States or from a province of Canada that required the person to have passed the National Board of Examiners in Optometry examination to qualify for licensure;

was engaged in the active licensed clinical practice of optometry in a state or territory of the United States or in a province of Canada for at least 3,120 hours during the 36 months preceding the date of application under this section;

has not committed an act in any jurisdiction that would have constituted a violation of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter at the time the act was committed;

has not been disciplined by an optometry licensing entity in another jurisdiction and is not the subject of a pending disciplinary proceeding conducted by an optometry licensing entity in another jurisdiction; however, the board may consider the disciplinary action and, in the board’s discretion, determine whether the person is qualified for licensure; and

has received education in pain management and opioid use and addiction adequate for the practice of optometry, unless the applicant has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number; an applicant may include past professional experience or professional education as proof of professional competence.

History.

(§ 35-3-142 ACLA 1949; am § 8 ch 76 SLA 1969; am § 12 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 16 SLA 2002; am § 4 ch 24 SLA 2006; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 2010; am § 25 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For application requirements, see 12 AAC 48, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added (8), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 08.72.175.
License endorsement.
[Repealed, § 7 ch 27 SLA 2010.]

Cross references. —

For a provision authorizing a licensee holding a license issued before June 2, 2010, who does not have a license endorsement issued under former AS 08.72.175(a) to apply to the board for a restricted license, authorizing the board to issue restricted licenses to certain optometrists as permitted under former AS 08.72.175(c), and to continue to renew those licenses, subject to exceptions, see § 8(b), (c), (d), and (e), ch. 27, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 08.72.180.
Annual renewal of license. [Repealed, § 7 ch 94 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.72.181.
Renewal of license.

[Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987.]

An optometrist licensed in this state and serving in the military service of the United States, while in the discharge of official duties, may maintain eligibility to practice in this state without paying a renewal fee by registering the optometrist’s name and place of residence with the department.

An application for license renewal must contain the name, office and post office address, date and license number of the licensee, and other information the board considers necessary.

Before a license may be renewed, the licensee shall submit to the board evidence that, during the

preceding licensing period, the licensee has met continuing education requirements as may be prescribed by regulations of the board to ensure the continued protection of the public; and

two years preceding the application for renewal, the licensee has completed at least two hours of education in pain management and opioid use and addiction, unless the licensee demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number..

Before a license may be renewed, the licensee shall provide evidence of continued professional competency in accordance with the regulations adopted by the board under AS

08.72.050

(5).

History.

(§ 9 ch 76 SLA 1969; am §§ 13-15 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 16 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 24 SLA 2006; am § 4 ch 27 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 17 SLA 2017; am § 26 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For license duration and further provisions relating to renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

For exemptions from compliance with requirements of (d)(1) and (2) of this section by certain optometrists holding restricted licenses authorized by amendments to this chapter made by ch. 27, SLA 2010, see § 8(e), ch. 27, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor’s notes. —

The first 2017 amendment to subsection (d), effective October 24, 2017, is reflected in the text.
The second 2017 amendment is effective July 1, 2018.
The language of the 2017 amendments has been harmonized by the revisor of statutes.

Administrative Code. —

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 48, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective October 24, 2017, in (d), substituted “during the preceding licensing period” for “in the four years preceding the application for renewal” following “board evidence that,” deleted the (d)(1) — (3) designations, and deleted (d)(1) and (2) relating to completion of required hours of continuing education on certain topics, and deleted “other” preceding “continuing education requirements” near the end.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, rewrote (d).

Sec. 08.72.185.
Retired license status.

On retiring from practice and on payment of an appropriate one-time fee, a licensee in good standing with the board may apply for the conversion of an active or inactive license to a retired status license. A person holding a retired status license may not practice optometry in the state. A retired status license is valid for the life of the license holder and does not require renewal. A person holding a retired status license is exempt from license renewal requirements of AS

08.72.181

.

A person with a retired status license may apply for active licensure. Before issuing an active license under this subsection, the board may require the applicant to meet reasonable criteria, as determined under regulations of the board.

History.

(§ 5 ch 27 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 27, ch. 10, SLA 2010 makes this section effective June 2, 2010, in accordance with AS

01.10.070(c)

.

Sec. 08.72.190.
Fee for license by reciprocity. [Repealed, § 10 ch 76 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.72.191.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for the following:

examination;

reexamination;

licensure by credentials;

license;

renewal.

History.

(§ 11 ch 76 SLA 1969; am § 16 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 44 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 6 ch 50 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 16 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 24 SLA 2006)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Secs. 08.72.200 — 08.72.220.
Examination, certificate and renewal fees. [Repealed, § 10 ch 76 SLA 1969.]

Sec. 08.72.230.
Fees and disbursements.

The department shall collect all fees and keep a record of each transaction, and shall remit to the Department of Revenue all money received.

History.

(§ 35-3-138 ACLA 1949; am § 12 ch 76 SLA 1969)

Sec. 08.72.240.
Grounds for imposition of disciplinary sanctions.

The board may impose disciplinary sanctions when the board finds after a hearing that a licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or engaging in professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime that affects the licensee’s ability to continue to practice competently and safely;

intentionally or negligently engaged in or permitted the performance of patient care by persons under the licensee’s supervision that does not conform to minimum professional standards regardless of whether actual injury to the patient occurred;

failed to comply with this chapter, with a regulation adopted under this chapter, or with an order of the board;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

failure to keep informed of or use current professional theories or practices;

addiction or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs that impairs the licensee’s ability to practice safely;

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd or immoral conduct in connection with the delivery of professional service to patients;

failed to refer a patient to a physician after ascertaining the presence of ocular or systemic conditions requiring management by a physician;

prescribed or dispensed an opioid in excess of the maximum dosage authorized under AS

08.72.276

;

procured, sold, prescribed, or dispensed drugs in violation of a law, regardless of whether there has been a criminal action or harm to the patient.

History.

(§ 35-3-140 ACLA 1949; am § 32 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 17 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 6 ch 49 SLA 1988; am § 27 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of board, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For standards of practice, see 12 AAC 48, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, substituted “that” for “which” in (4), (5), and (7), and added (11); and, effective October 24, 2017, added (10).

Secs. 08.72.250,
08.72.255.
Disciplinary sanctions; limits or conditions on license; discipline. [Repealed, § 49 ch 94 SLA 1987. For current law, see AS 08.01.075.]

Sec. 08.72.260.
Revocation of license by court.

A license may be revoked by the superior court upon proof of violation of law or for a cause for which the board may refuse admittance to its examination.
The attorney general shall prosecute appropriate judicial proceedings upon request of a member of the board.

History.

(§ 35-3-146 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 08.72.270.
Practice not at place of business.

A licensed optometrist who temporarily practices optometry away from the optometrist’s regular place of business shall display a license and deliver to each patient or person fitted or supplied with glasses or contact lenses a receipt showing the optometrist’s permanent place of business or post office address and the amount charged.

This section may not be construed as permitting peddling or canvassing by licensed optometrists.

History.

(§ 35-3-136 ACLA 1949; am § 19 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 7 ch 50 SLA 1988)